Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 8, section 5, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 64, article 10, section 17, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Use of sales and use tax revenuesnew text begin ; requirementsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end The revenues derived from the tax authorized under subdivision 1 must be used by the city of Edina to pay the costs of collecting and administering the tax and paying for the following projects in the city, including securing and paying debt service on bonds issued to finance all or part of the following projects: (1) deleted text begin $17,700,000deleted text end new text begin $18,700,000new text end plus associated bonding costs for development of Fred Richards Park as identified in the Fred Richards Park Master Plan; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) deleted text begin $53,300,000deleted text end new text begin $56,300,000new text end plus associated bonding costs for improvements to Braemar Park as identified in the Braemar Park Master Plandeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), $35,000,000 plus associated bonding costs for design and construction of new public safety facilities; new text end new text begin (4) notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), $6,000,000 plus associated bonding costs for tenant improvements to the Edina Art Center; new text end new text begin (5) notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), $8,000,000 plus associated bonding costs for a capital improvement plan for the Edina Aquatic Center; and new text end new text begin (6) notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), $4,000,000 plus associated bonding costs for design of the Braemar Golf Course Clubhouse. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), use of tax revenues for the projects listed in paragraph (a), clauses (3) to (6), is subject to voter approval at the November 3, 2026, general election. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Edina and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 8, section 5, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 64, article 10, section 17, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Bonding authority. (a) The city of Edina may issue bonds under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 475, to finance all or a portion of the costs of the projects authorized in subdivision 2 and approved by the voters as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The aggregate principal amount of bonds issued under this subdivision may not exceed: (1) deleted text begin $17,700,000deleted text end new text begin $18,700,000new text end for the project listed in subdivision 2,new text begin paragraph (a),new text end clause (1), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) deleted text begin $53,300,000deleted text end new text begin $56,300,000new text end for the project listed in subdivision 2, new text begin paragraph (a), new text end clause (2), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bondsnew text begin ; (3) $25,000,000 for the project listed in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds; (4) $6,000,000 for the project listed in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds; (5) $8,000,000 for the project listed in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (5), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds; and (6) $4,000,000 for the project listed in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (6), plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bondsnew text end . The bonds may be paid from or secured by any funds available to the city of Edina, including the tax authorized under subdivision 1. The issuance of bonds under this subdivision is not subject to Minnesota Statutes, sections 275.60 and 275.61. (b) The bonds are not included in computing any debt limitation applicable to the city of Edina, and any levy of taxes under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.61, to pay principal and interest on the bonds is not subject to any levy limitation. A separate election to approve the bonds under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.58, is not required. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Edina and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end